Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.26] TEACHING RACIAL, GENDER, AND UNIVERSAL EQUITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "racist or sexist concept" includes any of the following concepts: new text end new text begin (1) one race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex; new text end new text begin (2) an individual, by virtue of race or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive, whether consciously or unconsciously; new text end new text begin (3) an individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse treatment due to the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (4) an individual should receive favorable treatment due to the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (5) an individual or institution cannot or should not treat individuals without regard to race or sex; new text end new text begin (6) an individual's moral character is determined by the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (7) an individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, bears responsibility for actions committed in the past by members of the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (8) meritocracy or merit-based systems are either racist or sexist; and new text end new text begin (9) the United States or the state is fundamentally racist or sexist. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Instructional prohibitions. new text end new text begin No school district or charter school may: new text end new text begin (1) teach, advocate, or encourage the adoption of a racist or sexist concept while instructing students; new text end new text begin (2) penalize or treat adversely a student who refuses to adopt or express any racist or sexist concept; new text end new text begin (3) host, pay, or provide a venue for a speaker who espouses, advocates, or promotes any racist or sexist concept; new text end new text begin (4) require a student to read, view, or listen to a book, article, video presentation, digital presentation, or other learning material that espouses, advocates, or promotes a racist or sexist concept; or new text end new text begin (5) contract with a company, nonprofit organization, or state or local government entity to take any action prohibited in clauses (1) to (4). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Private cause of action. new text end new text begin A resident of the state has standing and a private cause of action to file a civil complaint in a district court against a school district or charter school claiming that it has violated a provision of this act. If a court finds that the school district or charter school has violated a provision of this act, the court shall enjoin the violating school district or charter school from receiving funding from the state in the following fiscal year and shall award costs and attorney fees to the complainant. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [136F.33] TEACHING RACIAL, GENDER, AND UNIVERSAL EQUITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "racist or sexist concept" includes any of the following concepts: new text end new text begin (1) one race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex; new text end new text begin (2) an individual, by virtue of race or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive, whether consciously or unconsciously; new text end new text begin (3) an individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse treatment due to the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (4) an individual should receive favorable treatment due to the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (5) an individual or institution cannot or should not treat individuals without regard to race or sex; new text end new text begin (6) an individual's moral character is determined by the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (7) an individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, bears responsibility for actions committed in the past by members of the individual's race or sex; new text end new text begin (8) meritocracy or merit-based systems are either racist or sexist; and new text end new text begin (9) the United States or the state is fundamentally racist or sexist. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Instructional prohibitions. new text end new text begin (a) No faculty at a Minnesota state college or university may: new text end new text begin (1) teach, advocate, or encourage the adoption of a racist or sexist concept while instructing students; or new text end new text begin (2) penalize or treat adversely a student who refuses to adopt or express any racist or sexist concept. new text end new text begin (b) No Minnesota state college or university may: new text end new text begin (1) host, pay, or provide a venue for a speaker who espouses, advocates, or promotes any racist or sexist concept; or new text end new text begin (2) require a student to read, view, or listen to a book, article, video presentation, digital presentation, or other learning material that espouses, advocates, or promotes a racist or sexist concept. new text end new text begin (c) No Minnesota state college or university may contract with a company, nonprofit organization, or state or local government entity to take any action prohibited in paragraph (a) or (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Private cause of action. new text end new text begin A resident of the state has standing and a private cause of action to file a civil complaint in a district court against a Minnesota state college or university claiming that it has violated a provision of this act. If a court finds that the Minnesota state college or university has violated a provision of this act, the court shall enjoin the violating institution from receiving funding from the state in the following fiscal year and shall award costs and attorney fees to the complainant. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. new text end